Tennessee, session 114, HB2141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-170(a), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead the following:
(a) Notwithstanding § 10-7-504 or another law to the contrary, records of or
relating to an intercollegiate athletics program of a public institution of higher education
must be treated as confidential and must not be open for public inspection if:
(1) The records contain information relating to game or player integrity
and that is traditionally not revealed publicly due to the public institution of higher
education's need to maintain competitiveness in the sport to which the records
relate; or
(2) The records are commercial contracts entered into solely in
furtherance of an intercollegiate athletics program and contain information that if
disclosed to the public, reasonably could be used to affect the economic
advantage of a business over its competitors.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-170(f), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead the following:
HB2141
011881
- 1 -

(f) This section does not create or afford any private cause of action, liability, or
basis for injunctive relief or equitable relief by any private person or entity except for a
business asserting that disclosure of information would undermine an economic
advantage over its competitor.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-170, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection (g):
(g) Subdivision (a)(2) is repealed on July 1, 2033.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011881